Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201521-405
Existing business corporation; amend articles of incorporation; statement required; other entities; procedure.

(1) An existing business corporation may become a benefit corporation under the Nebraska Benefit Corporation Act by amending its articles of incorporation so that they contain, in addition to the requirements of section 21-220, a statement that the corporation is a benefit corporation. In order to be effective, the amendment must be adopted by at least the minimum status vote.

(2) An entity that is not a benefit corporation may become a benefit corporation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the entity is (a) a party to a merger or conversion or (b) an exchanging entity in a share exchange, and the surviving, new, or resulting entity in the merger, conversion, or share exchange is to be a benefit corporation. In order to be effective, a plan of merger, conversion, or share exchange subject to this subsection must be adopted by at least the minimum status vote.

Laws 2014, LB751, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB35, § 4.
January 1, 2017